Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
180

SOIL AND
WATER CONSERVATION DISTRICTS

Section

180-1 Definitions

180-2 General powers and duties of department

180-3 Additional powers and duties of department

180-4 Creation of soil and water conservation
districts;

petition

180-5 Hearing on petition

180-6 Referendum on creation; election of
officers

180-7 Determining feasibility of operation of
district

180-8 Organization of district

180-9 Renewal of petition to create

180-10 Adding territory; petition

180-11 Consolidating districts; petition

180-12 Appointment, election, qualifications, and
tenure of

directors

180-13 Powers of districts and directors

180-14 State agencies to cooperate

180-15 Discontinuance of districts

180-16 Budget

180-17 Repealed

Note

L 2014, c 218, §8
purports to amend this chapter.

Department of transportation's bridge rehabilitation and
replacement program; temporary exemption from certain construction requirements
of this chapter through June 30, 2017 or until completion. L 2012, c 218.

Cross References

Environmental courts,
jurisdiction over proceedings arising under this chapter, see §604A-2.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next